Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
State Zoo

153.500.
Designation of state zoo.

The Louisville Zoological Garden is hereby designated and declared to be the state zoo of Kentucky. The state zoo, so designated and declared, may create an educational center called the Metazoo, to serve the entire Commonwealth with a unique educational experience, may meet with regional and national groups to help develop ideas for research, conservation and housing of animals in simulated natural habitats, help in tourist promotion, create and offer visual presentations on the zoo and its programs throughout the Commonwealth, and be available to work with Kentucky’s colleges and universities in conjunction with accredited programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.